nl: Koppelingssysteem voor elektrische apparatuur: 3-punts categorie 0; 3-punts categorie 1; 3-punts categorie 2; 3-punts categorie 3; 3-punts categorie 4; Trekstang; Frontlader montage; Snelkoppeling voor schranklader; Achtermaaier; Universele snelkoppeling; Overig
ja: 動力機器のヒッチタイプ: 3ポイントカテゴリー0; 3ポイントカテゴリー1; 3ポイントカテゴリー2; 3ポイントカテゴリー3; 3ポイントカテゴリー4; ドローバー; フロントローダーマウント; スキッドステアクイックアタッチ; 牽引式; ユニバーサルクイックヒッチ; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja električne opreme: Trokutasti prihvat kategorije 0; trokutasti prihvat kategorije 1; Trokutasti prihvat kategorije 2; Trokutasti prihvat kategorije 3; Trokutasti prihvat kategorije 4; Vučna ruda; Prihvat prednjeg utovarivača; Brzi priključak za kompaktni utovarivač; Vuča; Univerzalni brzi prihvat; Ostalo
hu: Erőátviteli berendezés vonóhorgának típusa: 3 pontos, 0. kategória; 3 pontos, 1. kategória; 3 pontos, 2. kategória; 3 pontos, 3. kategória; 3 pontos, 4. kategória; Vonórúd; Homlokrakodó tartó; Csúszókormányos gyorscsatlakozás; Vontatható; Univerzális gyorscsatlakozás; Egyéb
sv: Typ av draganordning för motordrivet utrustning: 3-poängskategori 0; 3-poängskategori 1; 3-poängskategori 2; 3-poängskategori 3; 3-poängskategori 4; Dragstång; Frontlastarfäste; Snabbkoppling för kompaktlastare; Bogsering; Universal snabbkoppling; Övrigt
vi: Loại khớp nối thiết bị động lực: Hệ thống treo 3 điểm Nhóm 0; Hệ thống treo 3 điểm Nhóm 1; Hệ thống treo 3 điểm Nhóm 2; Hệ thống treo 3 điểm Nhóm 3; Hệ thống treo 3 điểm Nhóm 4; Thanh kéo; Khung gắn bộ xúc lật phía trước; Bộ gắn nhanh cho máy xúc nhỏ; Kéo theo sau; Bộ khớp nối nhanh đa năng; Khác
tr: Güç ekipmanı bağlantı tipi: 3 nokta bağlantı Kategori 0; 3 nokta bağlantı Kategori 1; 3 nokta bağlantı Kategori 2; 3 nokta bağlantı Kategori3; 3 nokta bağlantı Kategori 4; Çeki demiri; Önden yüklemeli montaj; Mini yükleyici hızlı bağlantı; Arkadan çekmeli; Evrensel hızlı bağlantı; Diğer
lt-LT: Technikos prikabinimo jungties tipas: 3 taškų 0 kategorija; 3 taškų 1 kategorija; 3 taškų 2 kategorija; 3 taškų 3 kategorija; 3 taškų 4 kategorija; Vilkimo sija; Priekinio krautuvo tvirtinimas; Mini krautuvo greitas prijungimas; Velkamas; Universalus greitas prikabinimas; Kita
sk-SK: Typ závesného zariadenia: 3-bodový kategórie 0; 3-bodový kategórie 1; 3-bodový kategórie 2; 3-bodový kategórie 3; 3-bodový kategórie 4; Ťažná tyč; Držiak na čelný nakladač; Rýchloupínacie zariadenie pre šmykom riadené nakladače; Vlečný; Univerzálny rýchloupínací mechanizmus; Iné
ko: 동력 장비 히치 유형: 3점 카테고리 0; 3점 카테고리 1; 3점 카테고리 2; 3점 카테고리 3; 3점 카테고리 4; 드로바; 프론트 로더 마운트; 스키드 스티어 퀵 어태치; 견인식; 유니버셜 퀵 히치; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta priklopa delovnega stroja: 3-točkovna kategorija 0; 3-točkovna kategorija 1; 3-točkovna kategorija 2; 3-točkovna kategorija 3; 3-točkovna kategorija 4; Vlečna kljuka; Pritrditev za sprednji nakladalnik; Hitra montaža mini nakladalca; Vleka; Univerzalna hitra spojka; Druga
ro-RO: Tipul de cuplare pentru echipamente electrice: Categoria 0 cu 3 puncte; Categoria 1 cu 3 puncte; Categoria 2 cu 3 puncte; Categoria 3 cu 3 puncte; Categoria 4 cu 3 puncte; Bară de tracțiune; Montare încărcător frontal; Cuplare rapidă pentru încărcător compactor; De tractat; Cuplare rapidă universală; Altele
zh-CN: 动力设备挂接类型: 三点悬挂 0 类; 三点悬挂 1 类; 三点悬挂 2 类; 三点悬挂 3 类; 三点悬挂 4 类; 牵引杆; 前装载机挂接; 滑移式快速挂接; 拖挂式; 通用快速挂接; 其他
es: Tipo de enganche para equipo motorizado: Categoría 0 de 3 puntos; Categoría 1 de 3 puntos; Categoría 2 de 3 puntos; Categoría 3 de 3 puntos; Categoría 4 de 3 puntos; Barra de tiro; Montaje de cargador frontal; Enganche rápido para minicargadoras; Arrastrable; Enganche rápido universal; Otros
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης εξοπλισμού ισχύος: Κατηγορία 3 πόντων 0; Κατηγορία 1 3 βαθμών; Κατηγορία 2 3 βαθμών; Κατηγορία 3 3 βαθμών; Κατηγορία 4 3 βαθμών; Ράβδος έλξης; Βάση μπροστινού φορτωτή; Ταχυσύνδεσμος τιμονιού ολίσθησης; Ρυμουλκούμενο; Γενικής χρήσης γρήγορη ραφή; Άλλο
th: ประเภทจุดต่ออุปกรณ์กำลัง: ติดตั้งพ่วง 3 จุด หมวดหมู่ 0; ติดตั้งพ่วง 3 จุด หมวดหมู่ 1; ติดตั้งพ่วง 3 จุด หมวดหมู่ 2; ติดตั้งพ่วง 3 จุด หมวดหมู่ 3; ติดตั้งพ่วง 3 จุด หมวดหมู่ 4; คานลากจูง; ติดตั้งแบบโหลดด้านหน้า; ชุดติดตั้งเร็วสำหรับรถตักล้อยาง; ลากจูงตามหลัง; ข้อต่อปลดเร็วแบบสากล; อื่นๆ
da: Anhængertræk til motorredskab: 3-points kategori 0; 3-points kategori 1; 3-points kategori 2; 3-points kategori 3; 3-points kategori 4; Trækstang; Frontlæssermontering; Hurtigmontering til minilæsser; Trækkende; Universal hurtigskift; Andet
en: Power equipment hitch type: 3-point Category 0; 3-point Category 1; 3-point Category 2; 3-point Category 3; 3-point Category 4; Drawbar; Front-loader mount; Skid steer quick attach; Tow-behind; Universal quick hitch; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de engate do equipamento motorizado: Categoria 0 de 3 pontos; Categoria 1 de 3 pontos; Categoria 2 de 3 pontos; Categoria 3 de 3 pontos; Categoria 4 de 3 pontos; Barra de tração; Montagem para carregador frontal; Engate rápido para minicarregadora; Rebocável; Engate rápido universal; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de engate para equipamentos elétricos: Categoria 0 de 3 pontos; Categoria 1 de 3 pontos; Categoria 2 de 3 pontos; Categoria 3 de 3 pontos; Categoria 4 de 3 pontos; Barra de reboque; Fixação para carregador frontal; Engate rápido para minicarregadeira; Rebocável; Engate rápido universal; Outro
zh-TW: 動力設備掛鉤類型: 3 點式第 0 類; 3 點式第 1 類; 3 點式第 2 類; 3 點式第 3 類; 3 點式第 4 類; 牽引桿; 前置式安裝; 輪式鏟裝機快速連接; 托掛式; 通用快速掛鉤; 其他
it: Tipo di attacco per attrezzatura elettrica: Categoria 0 a 3 punti; Categoria 1 a 3 punti; Categoria 2 a 3 punti; Categoria 3 a 3 punti; Categoria 4 a 3 punti; Barra di traino; Supporto per caricatore frontale; Attacco rapido per minipale; A traino; Attacco rapido universale; Altro
fi: Voimakoneen vetokytkimen tyyppi: Kolmipistekiinnitys, luokka 0; Kolmipistekiinnitys, luokka 1; Kolmipistekiinnitys, luokka 2; Kolmipistekiinnitys, luokka 3; Kolmipistekiinnitys, luokka 4; Vetoaisa; Etukuormaajan kiinnitys; Liukuohjatun ohjaajan pikakiinnitys; Vedettävä; Yleiskäyttöinen pikakiinnitys; Muu
pl: Typ zaczepu do sprzętu mechanicznego: 3-punktowy kat. 0; 3-punktowy kat. 1; 3-punktowy kat. 2; 3-punktowy kat. 3; 3-punktowy kat. 4; Belka zaczepowa; Mocowanie do ładowacza czołowego; Szybkozłącze skid steer; Do ciągnięcia; Uniwersalny szybkozaczep; Inne
bg-BG: Тип теглич за електрическо оборудване: 3–точкова категория 0; 3–точкова категория 1; 3–точкова категория 2; 3–точкова категория 3; 3–точкова категория 4; Теглич; Монтаж на предно товарене; Бързо прикачване за мини товарач; Теглещо се; Универсално бързо прикачване; Друго
fr: Type d’attelage pour équipement motorisé: Catégorie 0 à 3 points; Catégorie 1 à 3 points; Catégorie 2 à 3 points; Catégorie 3 à 3 points; Catégorie 4 à 3 points; Barre; Support de chargeur frontal; Attache rapide pour chargeuse compacte; Tracté; Attache rapide universelle; Autre
de: Anhängerkupplungstyp: 3-Punkte-Kategorie 0; 3-Punkte-Kategorie 1; 3-Punkte-Kategorie 2; 3-Punkte-Kategorie 3; 3-Punkte-Kategorie 4; Zugstange; Frontlader-Montage; Schnellkupplung für Kompaktlader; Anhänger; Universelle Schnellkupplung; Sonstiges
nb: Tilhengerfestetype for kraftutstyr: 3-poengs kategori 0; 3-poengs kategori 1; 3-poengs kategori 2; 3-poengs kategori 3; 3-poengs kategori 4; Trekkstang; Frontlasterfeste; Hurtigkobling for kompaktlaster; Sleping; Universal hurtigkobling; Annet
ru: Тип сцепного устройства для силовой техники: 3-точечная навеска категория 0; 3-точечная навеска категория 1; 3-точечная навеска категория 2; 3-точечная навеска категория 3; 3-точечная навеска категория 4; Сцепное устройство; Крепление фронтального погрузчика; Быстросъемное крепление для мини-погрузчика; На сцепке; Универсальное быстросъемное крепление; Другое
cs: Typ závěsu pro zahradní zařízení: Tříbodový závěs kategorie 0; Tříbodový závěs kategorie 1; Tříbodový závěs kategorie 2; Tříbodový závěs kategorie 3; Tříbodový závěs kategorie 4; Tažná lišta; Úchyt čelního nakladače; Univerzální rychloupínací deska (Skid Steer); Tažené; Univerzální rychloupínací závěs; Jiné